Mississippi, session 2026, SB2619.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 25-1-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-1-1.  (1)  The term of office of all officers, not otherwise provided for by law, shall be four (4) years and until their successors shall be duly qualified. (2)  Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, the person or entity with appointing authority for any state board or commission is not restricted in his or her selection of qualified candidates for appointment by lists or other nominations generated by the board or commission at issue, or by leaders or groups within any professional or other association. (3)  Preexisting laws that require the appointing authority to select candidates for appointment for state boards or commissions from a list generated by another person or entity shall have no force or effect, except that the appointing authority is free to consider recommendations of appointment from any individual or group in the state. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.